Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1064.
do enact as follows:SB1064,11Section 1. 30.50 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1064,2,3230.50 (2m) “Cabin motorboat” means a motorboat with enclosed spaces inside 3its structure. SB1064,24Section 2. 30.52 (5) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB1064,2,10530.52 (5) (c) Carbon monoxide information and sticker. 1. When the 6department issues a certificate of number card or a registration card for a 7motorboat under this subsection, the department shall provide the applicant with 8printed information on the dangers of carbon monoxide and boating. If the 9motorboat is a cabin motorboat, the department shall also provide the applicant 10with a carbon monoxide warning sticker.SB1064,2,13112. The department shall provide the printed information and sticker under 12subd. 1. at no additional cost to an applicant. The department may develop and 13produce the sticker or may purchase a sticker approved by the U.S. coast guard. SB1064,314Section 3. 30.62 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB1064,2,151530.62 (7) Carbon monoxide detection systems. (a) In this subsection:SB1064,2,18161. “Enclosed accommodation compartment” means a space containing 17designated sleeping accommodations, a galley with a sink, and a head 18compartment.SB1064,2,21192. “Marine carbon monoxide detection system” means a device or system for 20detecting carbon monoxide that is certified by a nationally recognized testing 21laboratory to conform to current UL Standards for use on motorboats.SB1064,3,21(b) No person may operate a motorboat that has an enclosed accommodation 2compartment unless all of the following apply:SB1064,3,531. The motorboat is equipped with a functioning marine carbon monoxide 4detection system to monitor the atmosphere of the main cabin of the enclosed 5accommodation compartment.SB1064,3,762. Each sleeping accommodation on the motorboat contains, or is located not 7more than 10 feet from, a functioning marine carbon monoxide detection system.SB1064,3,1083. A carbon monoxide warning sticker provided by the department or the 9original manufacturer of the motorboat is affixed to the interior of the enclosed 10accommodation compartment in plain view of the motorboat occupants.SB1064,3,1411(c) No person may sell a new motorboat that has an enclosed accommodation 12compartment unless the motorboat is equipped with a marine carbon monoxide 13detection system as required in par. (b) 1. and 2. and a carbon monoxide warning 14sticker is affixed as required in par. (b) 3.SB1064,415Section 4. 30.80 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1064,3,191630.80 (1) Any person violating any provision of ss. 30.50 to 30.80 for which a 17penalty is not provided under subs. (2) to (6) (7) shall forfeit not more than $500 for 18the first offense and shall forfeit not more than $1,000 upon conviction of the same 19offense a 2nd or subsequent time within one year.SB1064,520Section 5. 30.80 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB1064,3,222130.80 (7) Any person violating s. 30.62 (7) (b) or (c) may be required to forfeit 22not more than $300 for a 2nd or subsequent offense.SB1064,623Section 6. Initial applicability.SB1064,4,21(1) This act first applies to motorboats sold, registered, or operated on the 2effective date of this subsection.SB1064,4,33